libreoffice/eo-skrablo.aff
# Tiu dosiero estas publikigita laŭ GPL Permesilo
# legu plu sur: http://www.gnu.org
# 
# This file is free software; you can redistribute it and/or
# modify it under the terms of the GNU General Public License
# as published by the Free Software Foundation; either version 2
# of the License, or (at your option) any later version.
# 
# This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
# but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
# MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
# GNU General Public License for more details.
# 
# You should have received a copy of the GNU General Public License
# along with this program; if not, write to the Free Software
#  Foundation, Inc., 59 Temple Place - Suite 330, Boston, MA  02111-1307, USA.

# Autoro: Artur Trzewik mail@xdobry.de 
# 2010-01
# 
# Tiu dosiero definas afiksoj por hunspell 1.2.8 literumilo
# En tiu version vortfarado estas subportata
# Sed tio povas konduki al eraroj cxar unu erara (mistajpita) vorto povas esti la kunligo
# de validaj radikoj 
#
# ekz. kontrau = kon/i + tra/i + u
#


# Ŝanĝita de Jacob Nordfalk jacob.nordfalk@gmail.com  marto 2019
# mi enmetis ½ por ĉiuj finaĵoj uzebla por Skrablo

LANG eo_EO

SET UTF-8
FLAG UTF-8
TRY oaeinsrltkumvjdpbĉgfcĝAŭKMzNhŝSPLDUIVJOTEFHBĵĈRŜCĜZĥGĴĤŬ'-
WORDCHARS oaeinsrltkumvjdpbĉgfcĝAŭKMzNhŝSPLDUIVJOTEFHBĵĈRŜCĜZĥGĴĤŬ'-
KEY qwertyuiop|asdfghjkl|zxcvbnm

# this is not useful for OpenOffice, which has its own mechanism for treating interpunction
BREAK 2
BREAK ˆ-
BREAK -$

# common two-letter surrogates for the special Esperanto characters: the "h-convention" and the "x-convention"
# (this list includes "uh", which is actually not a part of the h-convention, but used (incorrectly) by some authors)
REP 12
REP ch ĉ
REP cx ĉ
REP gh ĝ
REP gx ĝ
REP hh ĥ
REP hx ĥ
REP jh ĵ
REP jx ĵ
REP sh ŝ
REP sx ŝ
REP uh ŭ
REP ux ŭ

# some possible single-letter surrogates for the special Esperanto characters (the list does not aim to be complete)
MAP 6
MAP cčćĉ
MAP gĝ
MAP hĥ
MAP jĵ
MAP sšŝ
MAP uwùúůŭ

NEEDAFFIX X
# aldonoaj por morf vortaro
COMPOUNDFLAG 2
COMPOUNDPERMITFLAG 3
ONLYINCOMPOUND 4
COMPOUNDBEGIN 5
#COMPOUNDMIDDLE 5
COMPOUNDFORBIDFLAG 7


PFX p Y 4
PFX p 0 pli .
PFX p 0 malpli .
PFX p 0 plimal .
PFX p 0 mal .

PFX m Y 3
PFX m 0 mal .
PFX m 0 ne .
PFX m 0 nemal .

PFX n Y 1
PFX n 0 ne .

PFX € Y 1
PFX € 0 E- .

SFX N Y 9
SFX N 0 ½ .
SFX N 0 o½ .
SFX N 0 on½ .
SFX N 0 oj½ .
SFX N 0 ojn½ .
SFX N 0 a½ .
SFX N 0 an½ .
SFX N 0 aj½ .
SFX N 0 ajn½ .

SFX Ñ Y 5
SFX Ñ 0 ½ .
SFX Ñ 0 a½ .
SFX Ñ 0 an½ .
SFX Ñ 0 aj½ .
SFX Ñ 0 ajn½ .


#Nur adverbo
SFX E Y 2
SFX E 0 ½ .
SFX E 0 e½ .

# Adjektiva radiko

SFX A Y 73
SFX A 0 a½/2XmNEV€ .
SFX A 0 eg½/2XmNEV .
SFX A 0 ega½/2XmNEV .
SFX A 0 et½/2XmNEV .
SFX A 0 eta½/2XmNEV .
SFX A 0 ul½/2XmNE€ .
SFX A 0 ul½/2XmNE€ .
SFX A 0 ulo½/2XmNE€ .
SFX A 0 ulin½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 ulino½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 egul½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 egulo½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 egulin½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 egulino½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 etul½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 etulo½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 etulin½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 etulino½/2XmNE .
SFX A 0 eco½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 eca½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 aĵo½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 ec½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 ec½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 aĵ½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 egaĵ½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 aĵeg½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 etaĵ½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 aĵet½/2XmN .
SFX A 0 igo½/2XpV .
SFX A 0 iga½/2XpnN .
SFX A 0 igato½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igoto½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igito½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 iganto½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igonto½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 iginto½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 ig½/2XpV .
SFX A 0 ig½/2XpnN .
SFX A 0 igat½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igot½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igit½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igant½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igont½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igint½/XpnNE .
SFX A 0 igil½/2XpN .
SFX A 0 0/543 .
SFX A 0 ½/543 .
SFX A 0 o½/543 .
SFX A 0 on½/543 .
SFX A 0 oj½/543 .
SFX A 0 ojn½/543 .
SFX A 0 an½/543 .
SFX A 0 aj½/543 .
SFX A 0 ajn½/543 .
SFX A 0 -/543 .
SFX A 0 ega½/543 .
SFX A 0 ego½/543 .
SFX A 0 eta½/543 .
SFX A 0 eto½/543 .
SFX A 0 ula½/543 .
SFX A 0 ulo½/543 .
SFX A 0 aĵo½/543 .
SFX A 0 aĵa½/543 .
SFX A 0 iga½/543 .
SFX A 0 eg½/543 .
SFX A 0 eg½/543 .
SFX A 0 et½/543 .
SFX A 0 et½/543 .
SFX A 0 ul½/543 .
SFX A 0 ul½/543 .
SFX A 0 aĵ½/543 .
SFX A 0 aĵ½/543 .
SFX A 0 ig½/543 .
SFX A 0 i½ .
SFX A 0 os½ .
SFX A 0 is½ .
SFX A 0 as½ .
SFX A 0 us½ .
SFX A 0 u½ .


# A sen vortfarado
# pro tre mallongaj radikoj (ul, ad , ...)

SFX Ā Y 25
SFX Ā 0 ½/XmNEV .
SFX Ā 0 ega½/XmNEV .
SFX Ā 0 eta½/XmNEV .
SFX Ā 0 ulo½/XmNE .
SFX Ā 0 ulino½/XmNE .
SFX Ā 0 egul/XmNE .
SFX Ā 0 egulin/XmNE .
SFX Ā 0 etul/XmNE .
SFX Ā 0 etulin/XmNE .
SFX Ā 0 eca½/XmN .
SFX Ā 0 egec/XmN .
SFX Ā 0 aĵa½/XmN .
SFX Ā 0 egaĵ/XmN .
SFX Ā 0 aĵeg/XmN .
SFX Ā 0 etaĵ/XmN .
SFX Ā 0 aĵet/XmN .
SFX Ā 0 iga½/XpV .
SFX Ā 0 igo½/XpnN .
SFX Ā 0 igata½/XpnNE .
SFX Ā 0 igota½/XpnNE .
SFX Ā 0 igita½/XpnNE .
SFX Ā 0 iganta½/XpnNE .
SFX Ā 0 igonta½/XpnNE .
SFX Ā 0 iginta½/XpnNE .
SFX Ā 0 igilo½/XpN .
SFX Ā 0 i½ .
SFX Ā 0 os½ .
SFX Ā 0 is½ .
SFX Ā 0 as½ .
SFX Ā 0 us½ .
SFX Ā 0 u½ .

# nur adjektivo kaj adverbo

SFX Å Y 1
SFX Å 0 0/XNE .

SFX O Y 9
SFX O 0 ' .
SFX O 0 0/2XN€ .
SFX O 0 0/543 .
SFX O 0 o-/543 .
SFX O 0 ½/543 .
SFX O 0 o½/543 .
SFX O 0 oj½/543 .
SFX O 0 on½/543 .
SFX O 0 ojn½/543 .

SFX Ō Y 1
SFX Ō 0 0/XN .

# Verba radiko

SFX I Y 38
SFX I 0 0/2XV .
SFX I 0 0/2XnN€ .
SFX I 0 anto½/2XnNE .
SFX I 0 antino½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 onto½/2XnNE .
SFX I 0 ontino½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 into½/2XnNE .
SFX I 0 intino/2XnN .
SFX I 0 emo½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 emul½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 emulo½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 povo½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 kapablo½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 ado½/2XnN€ .
SFX I 0 0/543 .
SFX I 0 o½/543 .
SFX I 0 o-/543 .
SFX I 0 -/543 .
SFX I 0 ½/2XV .
SFX I 0 i½ .
SFX I 0 os½ .
SFX I 0 is½ .
SFX I 0 as½ .
SFX I 0 us½ .
SFX I 0 u½ .
SFX I 0 ½/2XnN€ .
SFX I 0 ant½/2XnNE .
SFX I 0 antin½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 ont½/2XnNE .
SFX I 0 ontin½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 int½/2XnNE .
SFX I 0 into½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 em½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 emul½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 emulo½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 pov½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 kapabl½/2XnN .
SFX I 0 ad½/2XnN€ .


SFX Ī Y 26
SFX Ī 0 ½/XV .
SFX Ī 0 0/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 anto½/XnNE .
SFX Ī 0 antino½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 onto½/XnNE .
SFX Ī 0 ontino½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 into½/XnNE .
SFX Ī 0 int½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 emo½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 emulo½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 emulino/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 povo½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 kapablo½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 ado½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 ant½/XnNE .
SFX Ī 0 antin½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 ont½/XnNE .
SFX Ī 0 onto½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 int½/XnNE .
SFX Ī 0 into½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 em½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 emul½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 emulo½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 pov½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 kapabl½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 ad½/XnN .
SFX Ī 0 i½ .
SFX Ī 0 os½ .
SFX Ī 0 is½ .
SFX Ī 0 as½ .
SFX Ī 0 us½ .
SFX Ī 0 u½ .


SFX G Y 47
SFX G 0 igo½/2XV .
SFX G 0 ig½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 iganto½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igantino/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igonto½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igontino/2XnN .
SFX G 0 iginto½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igintino/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igemo½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igemulo½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igemulino/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igpovo½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igkapablo½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igato½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igatino/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igoto½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igotino/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igito½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igitino/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igind/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igindaĵo/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igend/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igendaĵ/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igebla½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igeblaĵo/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igant½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igantin/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igont½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igontin/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igint½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igintin/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igem½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igemul½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igemulin/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igpov½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igkapabl½/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igat½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igatin/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igot½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igotin/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igit½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igitin/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igind½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igindaĵ/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igend½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igendaĵ/2XnN .
SFX G 0 igebla½/2XnNE .
SFX G 0 igeblaĵ/2XnN .

# ne transitiva
SFX D Y 13
SFX D 0 ado½/XV .
SFX D 0 ad½/XnN .
SFX D 0 adanto½/XnNE .
SFX D 0 adantino/XnN .
SFX D 0 adonto½/XnNE .
SFX D 0 adontino/XnN .
SFX D 0 adinto½/XnNE .
SFX D 0 adintino/XnN .
SFX D 0 ademo½/XnN .
SFX D 0 ademulo½/XnN .
SFX D 0 ademulino/XnN .
SFX D 0 adpovo½/XnN .
SFX D 0 adkapablo½/XnN .

# transitiva ad
SFX F Y 25
SFX F 0 ado½/XV .
SFX F 0 ad½/XnN .
SFX F 0 adanto½/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adantino/XnN .
SFX F 0 adonto½/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adontino/XnN .
SFX F 0 adint½/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adintin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adem½/XnN .
SFX F 0 ademul½/XnN .
SFX F 0 ademulin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adpov½/XnN .
SFX F 0 adkapabl½/XnN .
SFX F 0 adat½/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adatin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adot½/XnNE .
SFX F 0 adotin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adit½/XnNE .
SFX F 0 aditin/XnN .
SFX F 0 adind½/XnN .
SFX F 0 adindaĵ½/XnN .
SFX F 0 adend½/XnN .
SFX F 0 adendaĵ½/XnN .
SFX F 0 adebl½/XnN .
SFX F 0 adeblaĵ½/XnN .

SFX ! Y 13
SFX ! 0 iĝo½/XV .
SFX ! 0 iĝ½/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝant½/XnNE .
SFX ! 0 iĝantin½/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝont½/XnNE .
SFX ! 0 iĝontin/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝint½/XnNE .
SFX ! 0 iĝintin/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝem½/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝemul½/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝemulin/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝpov½/XnN .
SFX ! 0 iĝkapabl½/XnN .

SFX ) Y 13
SFX ) 0 eta½/XV .
SFX ) 0 eto½/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etant/XnNE .
SFX ) 0 etantin/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etont/XnNE .
SFX ) 0 etontin/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etint/XnNE .
SFX ) 0 etintin/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etem/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etemul/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etemulin/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etpov/XnN .
SFX ) 0 etkapabl/XnN .

SFX § Y 15
SFX § 0 ego½/XV .
SFX § 0 ega½/XnN .
SFX § 0 eg½/XV .
SFX § 0 eg½/XnN .
SFX § 0 egant½/XnNE .
SFX § 0 egantin/XnN .
SFX § 0 egont½/XnNE .
SFX § 0 egontin/XnN .
SFX § 0 egint½/XnNE .
SFX § 0 egintin/XnN .
SFX § 0 egem½/XnN .
SFX § 0 egemul½/XnN .
SFX § 0 egemulin/XnN .
SFX § 0 egpov½/XnN .
SFX § 0 egkapabl½/XnN .

SFX ? Y 15
SFX ? 0 umo½/XV .
SFX ? 0 uma½/XnN .
SFX ? 0 um½/XV .
SFX ? 0 um½/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umant½/XnNE .
SFX ? 0 umantin/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umont½/XnNE .
SFX ? 0 umontin/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umint½/XnNE .
SFX ? 0 umintin/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umem½/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umemul½/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umemulin/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umpov½/XnN .
SFX ? 0 umkapabl½/XnN .

SFX % Y 27
SFX % 0 eto½/XV .
SFX % 0 eta½/XnN .
SFX % 0 ete½/XV .
SFX % 0 et½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etant½/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etantin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etont½/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etontin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etint½/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etintin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etem½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etemul½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etemulin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etpov½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etkapabl½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etat/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etatin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etot/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etotin/XnN .
SFX % 0 etit½/XnNE .
SFX % 0 etitin½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etind½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etindaĵ½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etend½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etendaĵ½/XnN .
SFX % 0 etebl½/XnN .
SFX % 0 eteblaĵ½/XnN .

SFX & Y 27
SFX & 0 ego½/XV .
SFX & 0 ega½/XnN .
SFX & 0 eg½/XV .
SFX & 0 eg½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egant½/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egantin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egont½/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egontin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egint½/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egintin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egem½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egemul½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egemulin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egpov½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egkapabl½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egat½/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egatin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egot½/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egotin½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egit½/XnNE .
SFX & 0 egitin/XnN .
SFX & 0 egind½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egindaĵ½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egend½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egendaĵ½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egebl½/XnN .
SFX & 0 egeblaĵ½/XnN .

SFX ( Y 27
SFX ( 0 umo½/XV .
SFX ( 0 uma½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 um½/XV .
SFX ( 0 ume½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umant½/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umanta½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umont½/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umonta½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umint½/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 uminta½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umem½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umemul½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umemulo½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umpov½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umkapabl½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umat½/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umato½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umot½/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umoto½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umit½/XnNE .
SFX ( 0 umito½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umind½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 uminda½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umend½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umenda½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umebl½/XnN .
SFX ( 0 umebla½/XnN .

SFX À Y 13
SFX À 0 iĝad½/XV .
SFX À 0 iĝad½/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝada½/XnNE .
SFX À 0 iĝado½/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadi½/XnNE .
SFX À 0 iĝadontin/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadint/XnNE .
SFX À 0 iĝadintin/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadem/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝademul/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝademulin/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadpov/XnN .
SFX À 0 iĝadkapabl/XnN .
